vec_IT/vec_IT.aff
FLAG long
# paròle ŧonkàe a lʼ iniŧio
PFX ‘0 Y 10
PFX ‘0 a ʼ a
PFX ‘0 d ʼ d
PFX ‘0 ga ʼ ga
PFX ‘0 g ʼ go
PFX ‘0 i ʼ i
PFX ‘0 kon ʼ kon
PFX ‘0 in ʼ int
PFX ‘0 kò ʼ kò
PFX ‘0 l ʼ l
PFX ‘0 v ʼ v

# paròle ŧonkàe a la fine
SFX ʼ0 Y 13
SFX ʼ0 n ʼ n
SFX ʼ0 r ʼ r
SFX ʼ0 u ʼ u
SFX ʼ0 ra ʼ ra
SFX ʼ0 xa ʼ xa
SFX ʼ0 me ʼ me
SFX ʼ0 te ʼ te
SFX ʼ0 do ʼ do
SFX ʼ0 ko ʼ ko
SFX ʼ0 a ʼ [^rx]a
SFX ʼ0 e ʼ [^mtv]e
SFX ʼ0 o ʼ [^dk]o
SFX ʼ0 ove óʼ ove
