vec_IT/vec_IT.dic
ge/ʼ0	po:noun is:singular_femenine
varar/a0a1a2P0P1P2‘0V0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
varo/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0‘0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:varar
vàroe/a0a1a2I1‘0	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:varar
vardar/a0a1a2P0P1P2‘0.0r5	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
vardo/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0‘0.0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:vardar
vàrdoe/a0a1a2I1‘0.0	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:vardar
véder/b0b1b2P0P1P2.0@0^1^2^6^7‘0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
vedre/.0@0^1^2^6^7‘0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple st:véder
vederò/b0b1b2I0.0@0^1^2^6^7‘0r0	po:verb ts:indicative_future st:véder
verò/b0b1b2I0.0@0^1^2^6^7‘0	po:verb ts:indicative_future st:véder st:védar st:ver
vedo/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0.0-0@0^1^2^6^7‘0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:véder st:vedar
védoe/a0a1a2I1.0-0@0^1^2^6^7‘0	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:véder st:vedar
visto/A1FS.0-0@0^1^2^6^7‘0	po:verb ts:participle_perfect_strong st:véder
védar/b0b1b2P0P1P2.0-0@0^1^2^6^7‘0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
vedarò/b0b1b2I0.0-0@0^1^2^6^7‘0	po:verb ts:indicative_future st:védar
volar/a0a1P0P1‘0+0*0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
vóloe/a0a1I1‘0+0*0	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:volar
voƚar/a0a2P0P2‘0+0*0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
vóƚoe/a0a2I1‘0+0*0	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:voƚar
voler/a0a1c2c3P0P1‘0.0^7^8	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
vuoler/a0a1c2c3P0P1‘0.0^7^8	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
volo/a0a1P0P1FSI0‘0*0.0^7^8	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:voler st:volar
vòlo/a0a1P0P1FSI0‘0.0^7^8	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:voler
vuòlo/a0a1P0P1FSI0‘0.0^7^8	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:voler
vòtu/I3‘0.0^7^8	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:voler st:voƚer
vuòtu/I3‘0.0^7^8	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:voler st:voƚer
vò-tu/I3‘0.0^7^8	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:voler st:voƚer
vuò-tu/I3‘0.0^7^8	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:voler st:voƚer
vutu/I3‘0.0^7^8	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:voler st:voƚer
vu-tu/I3‘0.0^7^8	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:voler st:voƚer
volsudo/M0FSY0‘0.0^7^8	po:verb ts:participle_perfect_strong st:voler st:voƚer
volsuda/F0Y0‘0.0^7^8	po:verb ts:participle_perfect_strong st:voler st:voƚer
vosudo/M0FSY0‘0.0^7^8	po:verb ts:participle_perfect_strong st:voler st:voƚer
vosuda/F0Y0‘0.0^7^8	po:verb ts:participle_perfect_strong st:voler st:voƚer
vuolsudo/M0FSY0‘0.0^7^8	po:verb ts:participle_perfect_strong st:voler st:voƚer
vuolsuda/F0Y0‘0.0^7^8	po:verb ts:participle_perfect_strong st:voler st:voƚer
vuosudo/M0FSY0‘0.0^7^8	po:verb ts:participle_perfect_strong st:voler st:voƚer
vuosuda/F0Y0‘0.0^7^8	po:verb ts:participle_perfect_strong st:voler st:voƚer
vòlvo/M0‘0.0^7^8	po:verb ts:participle_perfect_strong st:voler st:voƚer
vòlva/F0‘0.0^7^8	po:verb ts:participle_perfect_strong st:voler st:voƚer
voƚo/a0a2P0P2I0‘0*0.0^7^8	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:voƚer st:voƚar
vòƚo/a0a2P0P2I0‘0.0^7^8	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:voƚer
vuòƚo/a0a2P0P2I0‘0.0^7^8	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:voƚer
voltar/a0a1a2P0P1P2‘0+0-1*0.0r0V0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
volto/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0‘0+0-1*0.0^6	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:voltar ts:participle_perfect_strong st:vòlđer
vòlto/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0‘0+0-1*0.0^6	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:voltar ts:participle_perfect_strong st:vòlđer
vòltoe/a0a1a2I1‘0+0-1*0.0	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:voltar
voxar/a0a1a2P0P1P2‘0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
voxo/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0‘0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:voxar
vóxoe/a0a1a2I1‘0	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:voxar
vudar/a0a1a2P0P1P2‘0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
vudo/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0‘0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:vudar
vúdoe/a0a1a2I1‘0	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:vudar
al/‘0	po:article is:singular_femenine
an/‘0	po:article is:singular_masculine
la/F0Ṿèʼ0	po:article is:singular_femenine
na/ʼ0	po:article is:singular_femenine
un/ʼ0	po:article is:singular_masculine
no/ʼ0	po:adverb
poko/FSʼ0	po:adverb
poko/M0FSʼ0Ᵽd	po:adjective is:singular_masculine
poko/M0FSʼ0Ᵽd	po:pronoun is:singular_masculine
nu/ʼ0	po:pronoun is:plural_masculine
vu/ʼ0	po:pronoun is:plural_masculine
vui/‘0	po:pronoun is:plural_masculine
ge/ʼ0	po:pronoun is:singular_masculine
vòstro/A1‘0	po:pronoun is:singular_masculine
vòstro/A1‘0	po:adjective_possessive is:singular_masculine
sto/A1ʼ0	po:adjective_demonstrative is:singular_masculine
sto/A1ʼ0	po:pronoun is:singular_masculine
sto/A1ʼ0	po:quantifier is:singular_masculine
adove/FSʼ0	po:adjective_interrogative
adove/FSʼ0	po:pronoun
indove/FSʼ0	po:adjective_interrogative
indove/FSʼ0	po:pronoun
kome/ʼ0	po:adjective_interrogative
kome/ʼ0	po:adverb
kome/ʼ0	po:pronoun
kòsa/F0‘0	po:adjective_interrogative is:singular_femenine
kòsa/F0‘0	po:pronoun is:singular_femenine
kuando/ʼ0FS	po:adjective_interrogative
kuando/ʼ0FS	po:pronoun
tuto/A1FSʼ0	po:quantifier is:singular_masculine
de/ʼ0	po:preposition
in/ʼ0	po:preposition
indrío/‘0	po:adverb
indrío/‘0	po:preposition
intʼ/‘0	po:preposition
inté/‘0	po:preposition
so/ʼ0	po:preposition
sora/ʼ0-0	po:adverb
sora/P0P1P2ʼ0-0^6	po:preposition
tèrŧo/A1FSʼ0	po:numeral_ordenal is:singular_masculine
tèrso/A1FSʼ0	po:numeral_ordenal is:singular_masculine
kuarto/M0FSʼ0ět	po:numeral_ordenal is:singular_masculine
koarto/M0FSʼ0ět	po:numeral_ordenal is:singular_masculine
kuinto/M0FSʼ0ělěƚět	po:numeral_ordenal is:singular_masculine
sèsto/M0FSʼ0	po:numeral_ordenal is:singular_masculine
par/ʼ0	po:preposition
alora/‘0	po:adverb
aƚora/‘0	po:adverb
intanto/FS‘0	po:adverb
kaxa/F0ʼ0ǎSǎsětǒt	po:noun is:singular_femenine
sensa/ʼ0	po:adjective
sensa/ʼ0	po:preposition
senŧa/ʼ0	po:preposition
sènsa/ʼ0	po:preposition
sènŧa/ʼ0	po:preposition
vara/‘0	po:interjection
ankora/‘0	po:adverb
gonfia/F0‘0*0ět	po:adjective is:singular_femenine
gonfia/F0‘0*0ět	po:noun is:singular_femenine
gonfio/M0‘0*0ět	po:adjective is:singular_masculine
gonfio/M0‘0*0ět	po:noun is:singular_masculine
inpresta/F0‘0	po:noun is:singular_femenine
komòdo/ʼ0	po:adjective_interrogative
komòdo/ʼ0	po:pronoun
laso/M0FSět‘0	po:noun is:singular_masculine
laŧo/M0FSět‘0	po:noun is:singular_masculine
làrexe/F0FS‘0Ᵽd	po:noun is:singular_masculine
pòko/FSʼ0	po:adverb
pòko/M0FSʼ0ǎtět	po:adjective is:singular_masculine
pòko/M0FSʼ0	po:pronoun is:singular_masculine
vèca/F0ǎSǎsětǐnǒt‘0	po:adjective is:singular_femenine
vèca/F0ǎSǎsětǐnǒt‘0	po:noun is:singular_femenine
vèco/M0FSǎSǎsětǐnǒNǒt‘0	po:adjective is:singular_masculine
volentièra/M0‘0^7	po:adverb
volintièra/M0‘0^7	po:adverb
volta/F0ǐn‘0	po:noun is:singular_masculine
volto/M0FSǐn‘0	po:noun is:singular_masculine
voƚentièra/M0‘0^7	po:adverb
voƚintièra/M0‘0^7	po:adverb
voxe/F0FS‘0ět	po:noun is:singular_femenine
vòlta/F0‘0*0	po:noun is:singular_femenine
vòlta/‘0	po:adverb
vòlto/M0FS‘0	po:noun is:singular_masculine
frate/M0ʼ0ǎSǎs	po:noun is:singular_masculine
nudo/A1FSʼ0	po:adjective is:singular_masculine
vídola/F0Ṿe‘0	po:noun is:singular_femenine
voxaŧa/F0Ṿe‘0	po:noun is:singular_femenine
voxon/A2Ƀl‘0Ᵽd	po:noun is:singular_masculine
vokato/A1FS‘0	po:noun is:singular_masculine
vontièra/M0‘0^7	po:adverb
volàdego/A1FS‘0	po:adjective is:singular_masculine
volàdego/A1FS‘0	po:noun is:singular_masculine
voƚàdego/A1‘0	po:adjective is:singular_masculine
voƚàdego/A1‘0	po:noun is:singular_masculine
volèga/F0‘0	po:noun is:singular_femenine
gonfiesa/F0‘0ět	po:noun is:singular_femenine
konpaño/A1FS*0‘0-1ǒN	po:noun is:singular_masculine
voltada/F0Y0ǐn‘0	po:noun is:singular_femenine
vòƚega/F0‘0	po:noun is:singular_femenine
voxada/F0Y0Y1‘0	po:noun is:singular_femenine
gonfa/F0‘0*0ět	po:noun is:singular_femenine
gonfo/M0‘0*0ět	po:noun is:singular_masculine
vípara/F0‘0	po:noun is:singular_femenine
volentiera/M0‘0^7	po:adverb
volintiera/M0‘0^7	po:adverb
voƚintiera/M0‘0^7	po:adverb
puòko/FSʼ0	po:adverb
puòko/M0FSʼ0ǎtět	po:adjective is:singular_masculine
puòko/M0FSʼ0	po:pronoun is:singular_masculine
aveta/F0‘0	po:noun is:singular_femenine
